Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201775-306
Receipt for fees; license plates and renewal tabs.

Receipt for the payment of annual fees shall be issued by the commission. The commission shall issue sufficient license plates and renewal tabs to any regulated motor carrier who is in compliance with sections 75-301 to 75-322 and the rules and regulations of the commission, except contractors operating pursuant to section 75-303.02 and transportation network companies, for the purpose of identification of regulated motor carriers subject to sections 75-301 to 75-322 and to distinguish those regulated motor carriers from other commercial motor carriers not subject to such sections. The Director of Motor Vehicles shall prepare a form of license plate and renewal tab for such regulated motor carriers and furnish a sufficient supply of them to the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 6, p. 1379;

Laws 1969, c. 606, § 5, p. 2471;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 412, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 70;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 47;

Laws 2015, LB629, § 26;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 85.
April 28, 2017